Hawaii statutes.
§657-2 Mutual current account. In all
actions in the nature of debt, account, or assumpsit, brought to recover any
balance due upon a mutual, open, and current account, the cause of action shall
be deemed to have accrued from the time of the last item proved in the account.
[CC 1859, §1038; RL 1925, §2640; RL 1935, §3911; RL 1945, §10422; RL 1955,
§241-2; HRS §657-2; am L 1972, c 105, §1(b)]

Case Notes

Cited: 14 H. 495 (1902); 20 H. 433, 443 (1911); 33 H. 876,
881 (1936).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next